Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4470.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MELISSA HORTMAN MEMORIAL.new text end new text begin (a) $800,000 of the appropriation to implement the updated Capitol Mall Design Framework under Laws 2023, chapter 62, article 1, section 11, subdivision 2, as amended by Laws 2025, chapter 39, article 1, section 39, is to design and cast a statue recognizing Melissa Hortman's historic contributions to the state of Minnesota. The statue shall be incorporated into the design of a memorial garden on the State Office Building site by the Department of Administration. Minnesota Rules, part 2400.2703, shall not apply to the activities funded under this section. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, the Capitol Area Architectural and Planning Board must select the artist via a competitive process and consult with the immediate family of Melissa Hortman throughout the selection and design approval process. The statue design shall include the likeness of deceased family members of Melissa Hortman. new text end new text begin (c) Any unspent portion of the money under this section remaining after the casting of the statue is available for additional landscaping elements on the memorial garden site. new text end new text begin (d) The money under this section is available until June 30, 2029. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end